Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1712
Reciprocity; military spouse; temporary license.

The department, with the recommendation of the board, may issue a license based on licensure in another jurisdiction to an individual who meets the requirements of the Massage Therapy Practice Act or substantially equivalent requirements as determined by the department, with the recommendation of the board. An applicant for a license to practice under the act who is a military spouse may apply for a temporary license as provided in section 38-129.01.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 619;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 58.